foma/sakha_guess.foma
### sakha.foma ###

define BackVNonLab [ а | а а | ы | ы ы | ы а ];
define FrontVNonLab [ э | э э | и | и и | и э ];
define FrontHighVLab [ ү | ү ү | ү ө ];
define FrontLowVLab [ ө | ө ө ];
define BackHighVLab [ у | у у | у о ];
define BackLowVLab [ о | о о ];
define Vowel [ а | а а | ы | ы ы | ы а | э | э э | и | и и | и э | ү | ү ү | ү ө | ө | ө ө | у | у у | у о | о | о о ];
define Consonant [ б | в | г | ҕ | д | д ь | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | ҥ | н ь | п | р | с | һ | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | ъ | ь ];
define VoicelessConsSome [ к | п | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч ];
define VoicedCons [ б | в | г | ҕ | д | д ь | ж | з | й | р ];


## affix_specific

define VerbalizingYJ й  -> ы й  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

# allomorphs with vowels (except aar, see deletion below) appear only after consonant
define VerbalizingR ".drv.vrblz3."  [ы р  |  а р ] -> р  || Vowel "^"  _  ;

define VerbalizingRaar Vowel "^" ".drv.vrblz3." @-> "^" ;

define VerbalizingRaarDelete ".drv.vrblz3." -> 0  ;

define VerbalizingMSYJ м с ы й  -> ы м с ы й  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

define VerbalizingRGHAA р ҕ а а  -> ы р ҕ а а  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

define PresTenseARafterVowel а р  -> ы ы р  || Vowel "^" ".tns.pres."  _  ;

define PresTenseYYR Vowel "^" ".tns.pres."  @-> "^" ;

define PresTenseAR1or2 ".tns.pres." а р  -> а  || "^" _ "^" [".1sg." | ".1pl." | ".2sg." | ".2pl." ] ;

define PresTenseYYR1or2 ".tns.pres." ы ы р  -> ы ы  || "^" _ "^" [".1sg." | ".1pl." | ".2sg." | ".2pl." ] ;

define PresTenseAR3PL ".tns.pres." а р  -> а л  || "^" _ "^" ".3pl." ;

define PresTenseYYR3PL ".tns.pres." ы ы р  -> ы ы л  || "^" _ "^" ".3pl." ;

define DeleteTensePres ".tns.pres." -> 0  ;

define FutTenseContrNeg [".tns.fut.neg." |  ".tns.fut.contr."] ы а х   -> ы а  || "^" _ "^" [".1sg." | ".2sg." | ".3sg." ] ;

define FutTenseContrPos ".tns.fut." ы а х  (->) ы а  || "^" _ "^" [".1sg." | ".2sg." | ".3sg." ] ;

define FutTenseContr3SG ы а  "^" ".3sg." а  -> ы а  || "^" _  ;

define DeleteFut ".tns.fut." |  ".tns.fut.neg." |  ".tns.fut.contr." -> 0  ;

define DeletePers ".1sg." |  ".1pl." |  ".2sg." |  ".2pl." |  ".3sg." |  ".3pl." -> 0  ;

define CVBant ".cvb.ant." н  -> а н  || Consonant "^"  _  ;

define CVBantDelete ".cvb.ant." -> 0  ;

define CVBSim Vowel "^" ".cvb.sim." а  @-> ы ы  ;

define CVBSimDelete ".cvb.sim." -> 0  ;

define CVBPurp а а р ы  -> р ы  || Vowel "^" ".cvb.purp." _  ;

define CVBPurpDelete ".cvb.purp." -> 0  ;

define CaseAcc ы  -> н ы  || Vowel "^" _ "^" ;

define CaseAbl т а н  -> т т а н  || Vowel "^" _ "^" ;

define CaseIns н а н  -> ы н а н  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

define PossOneSG м  -> ы м  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

define PossTwoSG ҥ  -> ы ҥ  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

define PossThreeSG ".poss3sg." -> т  || Vowel "^" _  ;

define PossThreeSGDelete ".poss3sg." -> 0  ;

define PossThreePL "^" л а р  "^" л а р  -> "^" л а р  ;

## consonants

define VelarPlosiveLoss ҥ  к  -> ҥ  ||  _ "^" ;

define Voicing к  -> г  , п  -> б  , с  -> һ  , х  -> ҕ  , т  -> д  ||  _ "^" Vowel ;

define VoicingPostCons к  -> г  , п  -> б  , с  -> һ  , х  -> ҕ  , т  -> д  , ч  -> д ь  || VoicedCons "^" _  ;

define Devoicing г  -> к  , б  -> п  , һ  -> с  , ҕ  -> х  || [к | п | с | х] "^" _  ;

define NasalCH ч  -> н ь  || [ҥ | м | н] "^" _  ;

define NasalH һ  -> н ь  || [ҥ | м | н] "^" _  ;

define VoicedH һ  -> д ь  || [й | р | л] "^" _  ;

define VoicedCH ч  -> д ь  || й _  ;

define NasalB б  -> м  || ҥ "^" _  ;

define NasalBAssimN н  "^" б  -> м  "^" м  ;

define DevoicedBAssimN т  "^" б  -> п  "^" п  ;

define NasalL л  -> н  || [ҥ | м | н] "^" _  ;

define DevoicedGHColloquial ҕ  (->) х  || й _  ;

define PlosiveGH ҕ  -> г  || [ы | у | и | ү | й | л | р] "^" _  ;

define NasalGHAssimN н  "^" ҕ  -> ҥ  "^" ҥ  ;

define NasalGH ҕ  -> ҥ  || н "^" _  ;

define PlosiveGHAssimT т  "^" ҕ  -> к  "^" к  ;

define PlosiveHAssimT т  "^" һ  -> т  "^" ч  ;

define DevoicedGH ҕ  -> х  || х "^" _  ;

define DevoicedB б  -> п  || VoicelessConsSome "^" _  ;

define DevoicedL л  -> т  || VoicelessConsSome "^" _  ;

define PlosiveL л  -> д  || [й | р] "^" _  ;

define PlosiveH һ  -> д ь  || [й | р | л] "^" _  ;

define AssimilatedGHdevoiced ҕ  -> к  || VoicelessConsSome "^" _  ;

define DeleteStemPart т  -> 0  , п  -> 0  , к  -> 0  || л  "^" _ п  , м  "^" _ к  , ҥ  "^" _ п  , ҥ  "^" _ т  ;

define AssimilationCHIncosistent с ч  (->) ч ч  , т ч  (->) ч ч  ;

define SimplifyTCHInconsistent т ч  (->) ч  ;

## harmony

define NonLabFront а  -> э  , ы  -> и  , ы а  -> и э  || FrontVNonLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define NonLabBack э  -> а  , и  -> ы  , и э  -> ы а  || BackVNonLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabFrontHighFromBack а  -> э  , ы  -> ү  , ы а  -> ү ө  || FrontHighVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabFrontHighFromFront э  -> э  , и  -> ү  , и э  -> ү ө  || FrontHighVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabFrontLowFromBack а  -> ө  , ы  -> ү  , ы а  -> ү ө  || FrontLowVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabFrontLowFromFront э  -> ө  , и  -> ү  , и э  -> ү ө  || FrontLowVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabBackHighFromBack а  -> а  , ы  -> у  , ы а  -> у о  || BackHighVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabBackHighFromFront э  -> а  , и  -> у  , и э  -> у о  || BackHighVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabBackLowFromBack а  -> о  , ы  -> у  , ы а  -> у о  || BackLowVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabBackLowFromFront э  -> о  , и  -> у  , и э  -> у о  || BackLowVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

## technical

define DeleteLastMorphBoundary "^" -> 0 || _ .#. ;
define DeleteBoundaries "^" -> 0 ;



define OrthWord [Consonant* Vowel+ Consonant*]+;
read lexc sakha.lexc
substitute defined OrthWord for "^NOUNGUESS"
substitute defined OrthWord for "^VERBGUESS"
substitute defined OrthWord for "^TESTGUESS"
define Lexicon;

define Harmony NonLabFront .o.
    NonLabBack .o.
    LabFrontHighFromBack .o.
    LabFrontHighFromFront .o.
    LabFrontLowFromBack .o.
    LabFrontLowFromFront .o.
    LabBackHighFromBack .o.
    LabBackHighFromFront .o.
    LabBackLowFromBack .o.
LabBackLowFromFront;


define BaseGrammar Lexicon .o.
    VerbalizingYJ .o.
    VerbalizingR .o.
    VerbalizingRaar .o.
    VerbalizingRaarDelete .o.
    VerbalizingMSYJ .o.
    VerbalizingRGHAA .o.
    PresTenseARafterVowel .o.
    PresTenseYYR .o.
    PresTenseAR1or2 .o.
    PresTenseYYR1or2 .o.
    PresTenseAR3PL .o.
    PresTenseYYR3PL .o.
    DeleteTensePres .o.
    FutTenseContrNeg .o.
    FutTenseContrPos .o.
    FutTenseContr3SG .o.
    DeleteFut .o.
    DeletePers .o.
    CVBant .o.
    CVBantDelete .o.
    CVBSim .o.
    CVBSimDelete .o.
    CVBPurp .o.
    CVBPurpDelete .o.
    CaseAcc .o.
    CaseAbl .o.
    CaseIns .o.
    PossOneSG .o.
    PossTwoSG .o.
    PossThreeSG .o.
    PossThreeSGDelete .o.
    PossThreePL .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    Harmony .o.
    VelarPlosiveLoss .o.
    Voicing .o.
    VoicingPostCons .o.
    Devoicing .o.
    NasalCH .o.
    NasalH .o.
    VoicedH .o.
    VoicedCH .o.
    NasalB .o.
    NasalBAssimN .o.
    DevoicedBAssimN .o.
    NasalL .o.
    DevoicedGHColloquial .o.
    PlosiveGH .o.
    NasalGHAssimN .o.
    NasalGH .o.
    PlosiveGHAssimT .o.
    PlosiveHAssimT .o.
    DevoicedGH .o.
    DevoicedB .o.
    DevoicedL .o.
    PlosiveL .o.
    PlosiveH .o.
    AssimilatedGHdevoiced .o.
    DeleteStemPart .o.
    AssimilationCHIncosistent .o.
    SimplifyTCHInconsistent .o.
DeleteLastMorphBoundary;

#define Grammar [~$["GUESS+"] .o. BaseGrammar] .p. [$["GUESS+"] .o. BaseGrammar];

define Grammar BaseGrammar;

#regex [Grammar.l .o. DeleteBoundaries] | Grammar | [Grammar .o. DeleteBoundaries];
#regex [BaseGrammar.l .o. DeleteBoundaries] | BaseGrammar | [BaseGrammar .o. DeleteBoundaries];
#regex [BaseGrammar.l .o. DeleteBoundaries];

#regex Grammar .o. [Grammar.l .o. DeleteBoundaries];
define Segmenter [Grammar.l .o. DeleteBoundaries];
